North Dakota statutes. TITLE 43 Occupations and Professions
CHAPTER 43-12.2 Medical Personnel Loan Repayment Program [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 294, §
8]

§ 43-12.2-01.
State-community matching loan repayment program for nurse practitioners, physician assistants, and certified nurse midwives. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 425, § 2; 2009, ch. 363, § 1; repealed by 2015, ch. 294, §
8, effective August 1, 2015.

§ 43-12.2-02.
Powers of state health council. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 425, § 3; repealed by 2015, ch. 294, §
8, effective August 1, 2015.

§ 43-12.2-03.
Nurse practitioner, physician assistant, and certified nurse midwife selection criteria — Eligibility for loan repayment. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 425, § 4; 2009, ch. 363, § 2; 2011, ch. 3, § 18; repealed by 2015, ch. 294, §
8, effective August 1, 2015.

§ 43-12.2-04.
Community selection criteria. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 425, § 5; repealed by 2015, ch. 294, §
8, effective August 1, 2015.

§ 43-12.2-05.
Eligible loans. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 425, § 6; repealed by 2015, ch. 294, §
8, effective August 1, 2015.

§ 43-12.2-06.
Breach of loan repayment contract. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 425, § 7; repealed by 2015, ch. 294, §
8, effective August 1, 2015.

§ 43-12.2-07.
Release from contract obligation. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 425, § 8; repealed by 2015, ch. 294, §
8, effective August 1, 2015.

§ 43-12.2-08.
Term of obligated service. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 425, § 9; repealed by 2015, ch. 294, §
8, effective August 1, 2015.

§ 43-12.2-09.
Payment. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 425, § 10; repealed by 2015, ch. 294, §
8, effective August 1, 2015.